Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2356
Duty of custodian of will; liability.

After the death of a testator and on request of an interested person, any person having custody of a will of the testator is required to deliver it with reasonable promptness to a person able to secure its probate and, if none is known, to an appropriate court. Any person who willfully fails to deliver a will is liable to any person aggrieved for the damages which may be sustained by the failure. Any person who willfully refuses or fails to deliver a will after being ordered by the court in a proceeding brought for the purpose of compelling delivery is subject to penalty for contempt of court.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 78, UPC § 2-902.